Utah statutes.
10-8-90.   Ownership and operation of hospitals.

Each city of the third, fourth, or fifth class and each town of the state is authorized to construct, own, and operate hospitals and to join with other cities, towns, and counties in the construction, ownership, and operation of hospitals.



Amended by Chapter 292, 2003 General Session

